District of Columbia statutes.
20-912

Secured claim.

(a)

A creditor having a secured claim who surrenders the security shall be paid on the basis of the full amount of the claim.

(b)

A creditor having a secured claim who does not surrender the security shall be paid on the basis of one of the following:

(1)

the full amount of the claim allowed less the amount realized upon exhausting the security, if the creditor, during the course of administration, exhausted the security before receiving payment; or

(2)

the full amount of the claim allowed, less the value of the security determined by agreement or by the Court, if the creditor did not exhaust, or did not at the time have the right to exhaust, such security.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
This section is referenced in § 20-911.
1981 Ed., § 20-912.